Mississippi, session 2026, SB2414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 49-17-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-17-16.  (1)  (a)  An Advisory Council, hereinafter referred to as "Advisory Council," is created to conduct an independent study of the costs for the development and administration of the Title V program within the Department of Environmental Quality and to conduct an annual review of the costs of administering such programs. (b)  The costs to be included within the study for the Title V program shall be those costs set forth in Section 49-17-14.  After completing a study of the program needs and costs, the Advisory Council shall recommend an equitable fee system for the Title V program.  The annual review of the Title V program shall determine if the fee system is collecting sufficient funds to meet the program needs.  The Advisory Council shall recommend an appropriate fee schedule for the upcoming fee year and, if necessary, recommend changes to the existing fee system so that sufficient funds are collected through an equitable fee system.  Each annual review report shall be due January 1 of each year to the commission and the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality. (2)  The Department of Environmental Quality shall assist the Advisory Council by providing any information the Advisory Council may require to perform its duties under Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-45. (3)  The Advisory Council shall be composed of the following seven (7) persons appointed as follows: * * *  three (3)  four (4) representatives of industries that qualify for inclusion under the Title V program, that are required to pay the program fee, with * * * one (1) two (2) such representatives to be appointed by the Governor, one (1) by the Lieutenant Governor and one (1) by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority; the President of the Mississippi * * * Manufacturers Association Business Alliance; and the President of the Mississippi Farm Bureau Federation * * *; and the Chairman of the Mississippi Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel.  Nonappointed members of the Advisory Council may designate an alternate member to act in their stead in performing any function of the Advisory Council.  The length of term for each member of the Advisory Council shall be four (4) years.  Members of the Advisory Council may serve successive and multiple terms. (4)  Vacancies on the Advisory Council shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original appointments. (5)  The Advisory Council shall select from their membership a chairperson to preside over meetings and a vice chairperson to preside in the absence of the chairperson or when the chairperson shall be excused.  The Advisory Council shall adopt procedures governing the manner of conducting its business.  A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum to do business. (6)  Members of the Advisory Council shall serve without salary.  The members of the Advisory Council shall be entitled to receive reimbursement of their actual travel and hotel expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, incurred while in the performance of their duties as members of the Advisory Council to be paid on an itemized statement approved by the State Fiscal Officer.  Expenses shall be paid from fees collected in accordance with Section 49-17-30. (7)  The Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall provide technical, clerical and other support services, including services by contract, as the Advisory Council determines that it requires in the performance of its functions. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.